Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-240.23
Permitted improvements and growing crops of lessee; lease of land; value of improvements and crops; new lessee; payment.

If land is not sold under the provisions of sections 72-240.10 to 72-240.23, 72-257, and 72-258 and is leased according to section 72-258.01, the new lessee shall pay to the old lessee the value of his or her permitted improvements as determined for sale purposes.

Laws 1967, c. 467, § 14, p. 1455;

Laws 1971, LB 413, § 13;

Laws 1999, LB 779, § 39.